Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-208
Sections, how interpreted.

Sections 64-201 to 64-210 shall be so interpreted as to make uniform the laws of those states which enact them.

Laws 1969, c. 523, § 8, p. 2144.